test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ponjos_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - ponjos: # 2B
    ponjos+N+Sg+Nom: ponjos
    ponjos+N+Sg+Gen: ponnjoos
    ponjos+N+Sg+Acc: ponnjoos
    ponjos+N+Sg+Ill: ponjosân
    ponjos+N+Sg+Loc: ponjosist
    ponjos+N+Sg+Com: ponjosáin
    ponjos+N+Sg+Abe: ponnjoosttáá
    ponjos+N+Ess:    ponjosin
    ponjos+N+Par:    ponjosid
    ponjos+N+Pl+Nom: ponjoseh
    ponjos+N+Pl+Gen: ponjosij
    ponjos+N+Pl+Acc: ponjosijd
    ponjos+N+Pl+Ill: ponjosáid
    ponjos+N+Pl+Loc: ponjosijn
    ponjos+N+Pl+Com: ponjosijguin
    ponjos+N+Pl+Abe: ponjosijttáá
   
